Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 23. Lower Yazoo River Basin District
[Repealed]

§§ 51-23-1 through 51-23-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-23-1 through §51-23-7. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-351 to 5956-354; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, §§ 1-4]

§51-23-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-355; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, § 5; Laws, 1990, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 65, § 1]

§51-23-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-356; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 268, § 1; Laws, 1990, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 65, § 2]

§51-23-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-356; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, § 6; Laws, 1968, ch. 268, § 1]

§51-23-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-357; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, § 7; Laws, 1977, ch. 437]

§51-23-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-358; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 12]

§§ 51-23-19 through 51-23-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 403, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§51-23-19 through §51-23-23. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-359 to 5956-361; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, §§ 9-11]

§51-23-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-369; Laws, 1968, ch. 268, § 3]

§51-23-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-370; Laws, 1968, ch. 268, § 4; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 21]

§51-23-29 through §51-23-37. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-371 to 5956-375; Laws, 1968, ch. 268, §§ 5-9]

§51-23-39. [Codes, 1942, § 5956-362; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, § 12; Laws, 1968, ch. 268, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 473, § 17]

§51-23-41 through §51-23-49. [Codes, 1942, §§ 5956-363 to 5956-367; Laws, 1966, Ex. Sess., ch. 49, §§ 13-17]